Hawaii statutes.
[§415A-31] Effect of invalidity of part of
this chapter. If a court of competent jurisdiction shall adjudge to be
invalid or unconstitutional any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part
of this chapter, such judgment or decree shall not affect, impair, invalidate,
or nullify the remainder of this chapter, but the effect thereof shall be
confined to the clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this chapter
so adjudged to be invalid or unconstitutional. [L 1985, c 259, pt of §1]

Cross References

Severability, see §1-23.

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next